Mississippi, session 2026, HB242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The school board of a school district may employ licensed social workers and licensed psychologists to provide services to students enrolled in and in attendance at the schools of the school district, as determined by the superintendent of the district.  The school board shall fix the compensation of a social worker or psychologist employed by the district under this section. (2)  A school district that employs at least one (1) social worker or psychologist for every one thousand (1,000) students enrolled in the schools of the district is eligible for reimbursement for fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the salary of each social worker or psychologist from the State Department of Education.  The superintendent of any school district that is eligible for the reimbursement under this section shall apply to the State Department of Education for the reimbursement in a manner prescribed by the department.  After receipt of an application for reimbursement and any information that may be required by the department, the department shall pay to the school district an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the salary of each social worker and psychologist for whom the district is eligible to be reimbursed.  In making reimbursements to school districts for employing social workers and psychologists, the department may use any funds specifically made available for that purpose. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.